test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_oppus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - oppuš: # MLO, ok
    oppuš+N+Sg+Nom: oppuš
    oppuš+N+Sg+Gen: oppuužii
    oppuš+N+Sg+Acc: oppuužii
    oppuš+N+Sg+Ill: oppuužân
    oppuš+N+Sg+Loc: oppuužiist
    oppuš+N+Sg+Com: oppuužáin
    oppuš+N+Sg+Abe: oppuužiittáá
    oppuš+N+Ess: oppuužin
    oppuš+N+Par: oppuužid
    oppuš+N+Pl+Nom: oppuužiih
    oppuš+N+Pl+Gen: oppuužij
    oppuš+N+Pl+Acc: oppuužijd
    oppuš+N+Pl+Ill: oppuužáid
    oppuš+N+Pl+Loc: oppuužijn
    oppuš+N+Pl+Com: [oppuužijguin, oppuužijgijn]
    oppuš+N+Pl+Abe: oppuužijttáá
    
  Noun - almaš: # MLO, ok
    almaš+N+Sg+Nom: almaš
    almaš+N+Sg+Gen: almaažii
    almaš+N+Sg+Acc: almaažii
    almaš+N+Sg+Ill: almažân # a'lmažân
    almaš+N+Sg+Loc: almaažiist
    almaš+N+Sg+Com: almaažáin
    almaš+N+Sg+Abe: almaažiittáá
    almaš+N+Ess: almažin # a'lmažin
    almaš+N+Par: almažid # a'lmažid
    almaš+N+Pl+Nom: almaažiih
    almaš+N+Pl+Gen: almaažij
    almaš+N+Pl+Acc: almaažijd
    almaš+N+Pl+Ill: almaažáid
    almaš+N+Pl+Loc: almaažijn
    almaš+N+Pl+Com: [almaažijguin, almaažijgijn]
    almaš+N+Pl+Abe: almaažijttáá  
   
  Noun - kaijuš: # MLO, ok
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Nom: kaijuš
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Gen: kaijuužii
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Acc: kaijuužii
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Ill: kaijuužân
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Loc: kaijuužiist
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Com: kaijuužáin
    kaijuš+N+Sg+Abe: kaijuužiittáá
    kaijuš+N+Ess: kaijuužin
    kaijuš+N+Par: kaijuužid
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Nom: kaijuužiih
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Gen: kaijuužij
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Acc: kaijuužijd
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Ill: kaijuužáid
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Loc: kaijuužijn
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Com: [kaijuužijguin, kaijuužijgijn]
    kaijuš+N+Pl+Abe: kaijuužijttáá
